hu_hu.affix
PFX r Y 195 
PFX r 0 legújra/@ .
PFX r 0 legújjá/@ .
PFX r 0 legössze/@ .
PFX r 0 legát/@ .
PFX r 0 legáltal/@ .
PFX r 0 legvégig/@ .
PFX r 0 legvégbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legvissza/@ .
PFX r 0 legutána/@ .
PFX r 0 legtúl/@ .
PFX r 0 legtovább- b
PFX r 0 legtovább/@ [^b]
PFX r 0 legtova/@ .
PFX r 0 legtele/@ .
PFX r 0 legszét/@ .
PFX r 0 legszéjjel/@ .
PFX r 0 legszerte/@ .
PFX r 0 legszembe/@ .
PFX r 0 legrá/@ .
PFX r 0 legrajta/@ .
PFX r 0 legoda/@ .
PFX r 0 legneki/@ .
PFX r 0 legmellé/@ .
PFX r 0 legmeg/@ .
PFX r 0 legle/@ .
PFX r 0 legkülön/@ .
PFX r 0 legközre/@ .
PFX r 0 legközbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legkörül/@ .
PFX r 0 legkörbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legkölcsön/@ .
PFX r 0 legki/@ .
PFX r 0 legketté/@ .
PFX r 0 legkeresztül/@ .
PFX r 0 legjóvá/@ .
PFX r 0 legide/@ .
PFX r 0 leghátra/@ .
PFX r 0 leghozzá/@ .
PFX r 0 leghelyre/@ .
PFX r 0 leghaza/@ .
PFX r 0 legfönn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legfönn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legfönn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legfölül/@ .
PFX r 0 legföl/@ .
PFX r 0 legfélre/@ .
PFX r 0 legfélbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legfenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legfenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legfenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legfelül/@ .
PFX r 0 legfel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegújra/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegújjá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegössze/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegát/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegáltal/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegvégig/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegvégbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegvissza/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegutána/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegtúl/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegtovább- b
PFX r 0 legeslegtovább/@ [^b]
PFX r 0 legeslegtova/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegtele/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegszét/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegszéjjel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegszerte/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegszembe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegrá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegrajta/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegoda/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegneki/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegmellé/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegmeg/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegle/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegkülön/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegközre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegközbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegkörül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegkörbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegkölcsön/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegki/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegketté/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegkeresztül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegjóvá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegide/@ .
PFX r 0 legesleghátra/@ .
PFX r 0 legesleghozzá/@ .
PFX r 0 legesleghelyre/@ .
PFX r 0 legesleghaza/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegfönn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegfönn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegfönn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegfölül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegföl/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegfélre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegfélbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegfenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegfenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegfenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegfelül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegfel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegújra/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegújjá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegössze/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegát/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegáltal/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegvégig/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegvégbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegvissza/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegutána/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegtúl/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegtovább- b
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegtovább/@ [^b]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegtova/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegtele/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegszét/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegszéjjel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegszerte/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegszembe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegrá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegrajta/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegoda/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegneki/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegmellé/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegmeg/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegle/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegkülön/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegközre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegközbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegkörül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegkörbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegkölcsön/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegki/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegketté/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegkeresztül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegjóvá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegide/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegesleghátra/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegesleghozzá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegesleghelyre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegesleghaza/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfönn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfönn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfönn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfölül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegföl/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfélre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfélbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfelül/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegfel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegelőre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegelő/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegellen/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegegybe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegbenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegbenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegbenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegbele/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegalá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegagyon/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegeslegabba/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegelőre/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegelő/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegellen/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegel/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegegybe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegbenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legeslegbenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legeslegbenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legeslegbele/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegalá/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegagyon/@ .
PFX r 0 legeslegabba/@ .
PFX r 0 legelőre/@ .
PFX r 0 legelő/@ .
PFX r 0 legellen/@ .
PFX r 0 legel/@ .
PFX r 0 legegybe/@ .
PFX r 0 legbenn- n[^y]
PFX r 0 legbenn/@ ny
PFX r 0 legbenn/@ [^n]
PFX r 0 legbele/@ .
PFX r 0 legbe/@ .
PFX r 0 legalá/@ .
PFX r 0 legagyon/@ .
PFX r 0 legabba/@ .
PFX h Y 11 
PFX h 0 ezerötszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerszáz .
PFX h 0 ezernégyszáz .
PFX h 0 ezernyolcszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerkétszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerkilencszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerhétszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerháromszáz .
PFX h 0 ezerhatszáz .
PFX h 0 ezeregyszáz .
PFX h 0 ezer .

PFX b Y 9 
PFX b 0 ötszáz .
PFX b 0 száz .
PFX b 0 négyszáz .
PFX b 0 nyolcszáz .
PFX b 0 kétszáz .
PFX b 0 kilencszáz .
PFX b 0 hétszáz .
PFX b 0 háromszáz .
PFX b 0 hatszáz .

PFX a Y 9 
PFX a 0 ötven .
PFX a 0 tizen .
PFX a 0 nyolcvan .
PFX a 0 negyven .
PFX a 0 kilencven .
PFX a 0 huszon .
PFX a 0 hetven .
PFX a 0 hatvan .
PFX a 0 harminc .
PFX X Y 65 
PFX X 0 újra/@ .
PFX X 0 újjá/@ .
PFX X 0 össze/@ .
PFX X 0 át/@ .
PFX X 0 által/@ .
PFX X 0 végig/@ .
PFX X 0 végbe/@ .
PFX X 0 vissza/@ .
PFX X 0 utána/@ .
PFX X 0 túl/@ .
PFX X 0 tovább- b
PFX X 0 tovább/@ [^b]
PFX X 0 tova/@ .
PFX X 0 tele/@ .
PFX X 0 szét/@ .
PFX X 0 széjjel/@ .
PFX X 0 szerte/@ .
PFX X 0 szembe/@ .
PFX X 0 rá/@ .
PFX X 0 rajta/@ .
PFX X 0 oda/@ .
PFX X 0 neki/@ .
PFX X 0 mellé/@ .
PFX X 0 meg/@ .
PFX X 0 le/@ .
PFX X 0 külön/@ .
PFX X 0 közre/@ .
PFX X 0 közbe/@ .
PFX X 0 körül/@ .
PFX X 0 körbe/@ .
PFX X 0 kölcsön/@ .
PFX X 0 ki/@ .
PFX X 0 ketté/@ .
PFX X 0 keresztül/@ .
PFX X 0 jóvá/@ .
PFX X 0 ide/@ .
PFX X 0 hátra/@ .
PFX X 0 hozzá/@ .
PFX X 0 helyre/@ .
PFX X 0 haza/@ .
PFX X 0 fönn- n[^y]
PFX X 0 fönn/@ ny
PFX X 0 fönn/@ [^n]
PFX X 0 fölül/@ .
PFX X 0 föl/@ .
PFX X 0 félre/@ .
PFX X 0 félbe/@ .
PFX X 0 fenn- n[^y]
PFX X 0 fenn/@ ny
PFX X 0 fenn/@ [^n]
PFX X 0 felül/@ .
PFX X 0 fel/@ .
PFX X 0 előre/@ .
PFX X 0 elő/@ .
PFX X 0 ellen/@ .
PFX X 0 el/@ .
PFX X 0 egybe/@ .
PFX X 0 benn- n[^y]
PFX X 0 benn/@ ny
PFX X 0 benn/@ [^n]
PFX X 0 bele/@ .
PFX X 0 be/@ .
PFX X 0 alá/@ .
PFX X 0 agyon/@ .
PFX X 0 abba/@ .

PFX D Y 3 
PFX D 0 legeslegesleg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ]
PFX D 0 legesleg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ]
PFX D 0 leg [^AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWZ]
PFX " Y 39 
PFX " Ü ü Ü
PFX " Ű ű Ű
PFX " Ú ú Ú
PFX " Ö ö Ö
PFX " Ő ő Ő
PFX " Ó ó Ó
PFX " Í í Í
PFX " É é É
PFX " Č č Č
PFX " Á á Á
PFX " Š š Š
PFX " Ł ł Ł
PFX " Z z Z
PFX " Y y Y
PFX " X x X
PFX " W w W
PFX " V v V
PFX " U u U
PFX " T t T
PFX " S s S
PFX " R r R
PFX " Q q Q
PFX " P p P
PFX " O o O
PFX " N n N
PFX " M m M
PFX " L l L
PFX " K k K
PFX " J j J
PFX " I i I
PFX " H h H
PFX " G g G
PFX " F f F
PFX " E e E
PFX " D d D
PFX " C c C
PFX " B b B
PFX " A a A
PFX " &Aring; &aring; &Aring;
PFX ! Y 27 
PFX ! 0 ötven/% .
PFX ! 0 öt/% .
PFX ! 0 több/% [^b]
PFX ! 0 tíz/% .
PFX ! 0 trillió/% .
PFX ! 0 száz/% .
PFX ! 0 sok/% .
PFX ! 0 négy/% .
PFX ! 0 nyolcvan/% .
PFX ! 0 nyolc/% .
PFX ! 0 negyven/% .
PFX ! 0 millió/% .
PFX ! 0 milliárd/% .
PFX ! 0 két/% .
PFX ! 0 kilencven/% .
PFX ! 0 kilenc/% .
PFX ! 0 húsz/% .
PFX ! 0 hét/% .
PFX ! 0 három/% .
PFX ! 0 hetven/% .
PFX ! 0 hatvan/% .
PFX ! 0 hat/% .
PFX ! 0 harminc/% .
PFX ! 0 fél/% .
PFX ! 0 ezer/% .
PFX ! 0 egy/% .
PFX ! 0 billió/% .
