hu_hu.dict
ötödször/abh	
ötöd/WĹÔŘÝMmRTtabhz!)
ötvennégyezredik/nÓ×BVÜb)
ötvennégy/nVÜLlTtbhc
ötvenkétezrek/Ib)
ötvenkettőezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
ötvenhét/nVÜbhc	
ötvenhárom/mUÚbhc	
ötvenes/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
ötvenes/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
ötvenegyezredik/nÓ×BVÜb)
ötvenedszeri/bh
ötvenedik/!VÓn×Llbh)
ötvened/VÄÓn×LlRTtz!bh)
ötezrek/Iba)
öten/abh)
áradt/XADFU)
utoljára/D
tízmillióan/b)
tévedt/XBDGV)
támadt/XADFU)
trilliárdodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ)
trilliárdod/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!)
trilliomodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ)
trilliomod/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!)
tizenöt/ÝWŰMRbhc	
tizennégytrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
tizenkétmilliárd/mKkUÚQbci	
tizenkilenc/nVÜLlTtbhc	
tizenkettőezrek/Ib)
tizenhárombillióan/b)
tizenhetek/Ibh)
tizenegy/nVÜLlbhc	
tizedszeri/bh
tizedik/!VÓn×Llbh)
tized/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!bh
tikkadt/XADFU)
szörnyebbik/×nÓVDRTt)
század/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQSsYcˇťkAz!Ú)
szorzandó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťDFKX
sokmilliós/AUÖmŇDFSs
sodró/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX)
régebben/D)
ragadt/XADFU)
pezsgés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl
ottragadt/ADFUX)
négymillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcjKkaż	
négyes/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
négy/nVÜLlTtbhcÓ×a	
nyolcvanötmilliárdan/b)
nyolcvankilencmilliárd/mKkUÚQbci	
nyolcvanhetek/Ibh)
nyolcvanhatezred/BVÜb)
nyolcvanas/AUÖmŇDFSsabh
nyolcvanad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!bh)
nyolcezrek/Iba)
nyolcas/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťkADFabh
nyolcadszorra/abh)
nyolcad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsabhz!)
nyolc/mA$UÚSsbhcŮÖŇa	
negyvenötezren/b)
negyvenkilencezres/BŐVb)
negyvenhármak/Ibh)
negyvenhatbillióan/b)
negyvened/VÄÓn×LlRTtz!bh)
negyedszeri/abh
negyed/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRabhz!)	
negyed/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRabhz!	
nagyheti/BGVxĐŐÓ!)
milliárdodszorra/bh)
milliárdod/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!)
milliomod/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!)
metszenetek/X)
messzebbre/D)
lábadt/XADFU)
lassabbik/ŮmŇUDQSs)
közelebb/D	
kísérlés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl)
kétezrek/Iba)
képedt/XBDGV)
kisebben/D)
kilencvenöttrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
kilencvenkilencmillióan/b)
kilencvenhárom/mUÚbhc	
kilencvenhatezren/b)
kilencvened/VÄÓn×LlRTtz!bh)
kilencmilliárd/mKkUÚQbciAÖŇaż	
kilences/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
kilencedszer/abh	
kilencedik/!VÓn×Llabh)
kilenced/VÄÓn×LlRTtabhz!)
kettőmillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcjKkaż	
kettes/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
kettedszeri/abh|
kettedszer/abh|	
ketted/VÄÓn×LlRTtabhz!)
izzék/X)
ismétlendő/CÔŐŢDHWRMX)
húszas/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťkADFabh
hétezrek/Iba)
hét/VÓnčcłÜbh×ax	
hátul/D	
hárommilliárd/mKkUÚQbciAÖŇaż	
háromezredik/nÓ×BVÜb)
hármas/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťkADFabh
huszonkétezred/BVÜb)
huszonkét/bÜhc
huszonhetek/Ibh)
huszadszorra/bh)
huszad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!bh)
hetvennyolctrillióan/b)
hetvenkettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
hetvenhéttrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
hetvenes/VÓn×DGTtabh
hetvenegybillióan/b)
hetvenedszerre/bh)
hetvened/VÄÓn×LlRTtz!bh)
heti/BGVxĐŐÓ!
hetedszerre/abh)
hetedszeri/abh
heted/VÄÓn×LlRTtabhz!)
havi/AFUxĎŐŇ!
hatvanmilliárdan/b)
hatvankilenc/nVÜLlTtbhc
hatvanhárommilliárd/mKkUÚQbci	
hatvanadik/!AUÖmŇŮKkbh)	
hatvanad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!bh)
hatos/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťkADFabh
hatodszor/abh	
hatodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkabh)
hatod/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsabhz!)
hatmillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcjKkaż	
hatmilliárd/mKkUÚQbciAÖŇaż	
harminckéttrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
harminckilenc/nVÜLlTtbhc
harminchárommilliárd/mKkUÚQbci	
harmincas/AUÖmŇDFSsabh
harmincadszorra/bh)
harmincad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsz!bh)
harmadik/!AUÖmŇŮKkabh)
harmad/AĂUÖmŇKkQSsabhz!)
hamarabbi/UĎŇŐD	
gennyedt/XBDGV)
füstölgés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl)
följebbről/D)
forradt/XADFU)
felül/D	
felől/!
ezrek/Ib)
ezred/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRz!BÜb)
ernyedt/XBDGV#)
első/ŐŢÔWCRDŘÝMm)
ellenző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝X
egymilliárd/mKkUÚQbciAÖŇaż
egyes/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlDGabh
egyedszer/abh|	
derekabban/D)
böktek/X)
bágyadt/XADFU#)
billiárdodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ)
billiomodik/!AUÖmŇŮKkQ)
belső/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝D
aludjad/X)
alsó/ŐmŇUAQD
zsúfol/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
vetettek/X)
tönkrever/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
teljenek/X)
szédeleg/Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
sorosít/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
ringat/ŠĽŁĄOoŤX
plagizál/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
nyűnie/X)
milliárdszoroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
locsog/ŠŁOŤX
kurjantat/ŠĽŁOoŤX
karbantart/ŠĽŁOoŤX	
idéződik/Ş¤P­X
határozódik/ŠŁOŤX
germózik/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
fixíroz/Š§ĽŁĄOoŤX
egyem/X)
csíp/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
bujdokol/Š§ĽŁĄOŤX
aggályoskodik/ŠŁOŤX
hetek/Ia)
mosolygó/XAŇŐĎFUÎQ
dörgő/XCÔŐŢHWĚR
XI-es/VÓn×DGTt
-/ABCUVWKLMQRqr
-/ABCUVWKLMQRqr
